lib/D-Type/files/hyphendict/es.hyp
necro1e2
necro1i2
necro1o2
necro1u2
necro1h
necro1á2
necro1é2
necro1í2
necro1ó2
necro1ú2
neo1a2
neo1e2
neo1i2
neo1o2
neo1u2
neo1h
neo1á2
neo1é2
neo1í2
neo1ó2
neo1ú2
neto1a2
neto1e2
neto1i2
neto1o2
neto1u2
neto1h
neto1á2
neto1é2
neto1í2
neto1ó2
neto1ú2
norte1a2
norte1e2
norte1i2
norte1o2
norte1u2
norte1h
norte1á2
norte1é2
norte1í2
norte1ó2
norte1ú2
octo1a2
octo1e2
octo1i2
octo1o2
octo1u2
octo1h
octo1á2
octo1é2
octo1í2
octo1ó2
octo1ú2
octa1a2
octa1e2
octa1i2
octa1o2
octa1u2
octa1h
octa1á2
octa1é2
octa1í2
octa1ó2
octa1ú2
oligo1a2
oligo1e2
oligo1i2
oligo1o2
oligo1u2
oligo1h
oligo1á2
oligo1é2
oligo1í2
oligo1ó2
oligo1ú2
omni1a2
omni1e2
omni1i2
omni1o2
omni1u2
omni1h
omni1á2
omni1é2
omni1í2
omni1ó2
omni1ú2
i2o.
i2os.
paleo1a2
paleo1e2
paleo1i2
paleo1o2
paleo1u2
paleo1h
paleo1á2
paleo1é2
paleo1í2
paleo1ó2
paleo1ú2
para1a2
para1e2
para1i2
para1o2
para1u2
para1h
para1á2
para1é2
para1í2
para1ó2
para1ú2
penta1a2
penta1e2
penta1i2
penta1o2
penta1u2
penta1h
penta1á2
penta1é2
penta1í2
penta1ó2
penta1ú2
piezo1a2
piezo1e2
piezo1i2
piezo1o2
piezo1u2
piezo1h
piezo1á2
piezo1é2
piezo1í2
piezo1ó2
piezo1ú2
pluri1a2
pluri1e2
pluri1i2
pluri1o2
pluri1u2
pluri1h
pluri1á2
pluri1é2
pluri1í2
pluri1ó2
pluri1ú2
proto1a2
proto1e2
proto1i2
proto1o2
proto1u2
proto1h
proto1á2
proto1é2
proto1í2
proto1ó2
proto1ú2
radio1a2
radio1e2
radio1i2
radio1o2
radio1u2
radio1h
radio1á2
radio1é2
radio1í2
radio1ó2
radio1ú2
ranco1a2
ranco1e2
ranco1i2
ranco1o2
ranco1u2
ranco1h
ranco1á2
ranco1é2
ranco1í2
ranco1ó2
ranco1ú2
rmano1a2
rmano1e2
rmano1i2
rmano1o2
rmano1u2
rmano1h
rmano1á2
rmano1é2
rmano1í2
rmano1ó2
rmano1ú2
retro1a2
retro1e2
retro1i2
retro1o2
retro1u2
retro1h
retro1á2
retro1é2
retro1í2
retro1ó2
retro1ú2
romo1a2
romo1e2
romo1i2
romo1o2
romo1u2
romo1h
romo1á2
romo1é2
romo1í2
romo1ó2
romo1ú2
sobre1a2
sobre1e2
sobre1i2
sobre1o2
sobre1u2
sobre1h
sobre1á2
sobre1é2
sobre1í2
sobre1ó2
sobre1ú2
semi1a2
semi1e2
semi1i2
semi1o2
semi1u2
semi1h
semi1á2
semi1é2
semi1í2
semi1ó2
semi1ú2
i2a.
i2as.
2ótic
emi2o2
seudo1a2
seudo1e2
seudo1i2
seudo1o2
seudo1u2
seudo1h
seudo1á2
seudo1é2
seudo1í2
seudo1ó2
seudo1ú2
o2os.
socio1a2
socio1e2
socio1i2
socio1o2
socio1u2
socio1h
socio1á2
socio1é2
socio1í2
socio1ó2
socio1ú2
a3rio.
a3rios.
4ón.
4ones.
4i4er.
4o2ide.
4o2ides.
4i2dal.
4i2dales.
4i3deo.
4i3deos.
sub1a2
sub1e2
sub1i2
sub1o2
sub1u2
sub1á2
sub1é2
sub1í2
sub1ó2
sub1ú2
su2b
.sub2ast
sub2i1ll
sub2i1mien
sub2intra
sub2lev
sub2lim
sub3ray
supe2r1a2
supe2r1e2
supe2r1i2
supe2r1o2
supe2r1u2
supe2r3r
supe2r1á2
supe2r1é2
supe2r1í2
supe2r1ó2
supe2r1ú2
supra1a2
supra1e2
supra1i2
supra1o2
supra1u2
supra1h
supra1á2
supra1é2
supra1í2
supra1ó2
supra1ú2
talmo1a2
talmo1e2
talmo1i2
talmo1o2
talmo1u2
talmo1h
talmo1á2
talmo1é2
talmo1í2
talmo1ó2
talmo1ú2
termo1a2
termo1e2
termo1i2
termo1o2
termo1u2
termo1h
termo1á2
termo1é2
termo1í2
termo1ó2
termo1ú2
tetra1a2
tetra1e2
tetra1i2
tetra1o2
tetra1u2
tetra1h
tetra1á2
tetra1é2
tetra1í2
tetra1ó2
tetra1ú2
topo1a2
topo1e2
topo1i2
topo1o2
topo1u2
topo1h
topo1á2
topo1é2
topo1í2
topo1ó2
topo1ú2
tropo1a2
tropo1e2
tropo1i2
tropo1o2
tropo1u2
tropo1h
tropo1á2
tropo1é2
tropo1í2
tropo1ó2
tropo1ú2
ultra1a2
ultra1e2
ultra1i2
ultra1o2
ultra1u2
ultra1h
ultra1á2
ultra1é2
ultra1í2
ultra1ó2
ultra1ú2
xeno1a2
xeno1e2
xeno1i2
xeno1o2
xeno1u2
xeno1h
xeno1á2
xeno1é2
xeno1í2
xeno1ó2
xeno1ú2
inter4és
inter4esar
inter4in
inter4ino
inter4ior
mili4ar
mili4ario
mini4atur
para4íso
para4ulata
poli4árq
poli4éste
poli4andr
poli4antea
poli4arq
poli4omiel
post4ín
post4óni
post4a
post4al
post4e
post4elero
post4emero
post4erga
post4eri
post4eta
post4ila
post4ill
post4ine
post4izo
post4or
post4ul
post4ura
pos4t3rom
pos4t3ope
pos4t3rev
pro4emio
pro4eza
super4able
super4ación
super4ar
super4ior
tele4olótico
tele4ología
tran4sacc
trans4ar
trans4eúnte
trans4iber
trans4ición
trans4ido
trans4igen
trans4igir
trans4istor
trans4itab
trans4it
trans4itorio
trans4ubsta
ultra4ísmo
wa3s4h
.bi1anual
.bi1aur
.bien1and
.bien1apa
.bien1ave
.bien1est
.bien1int
.bi1ox
.bi1óx
.bi1un
.contra1a
.contra1ind
.en1aceit
.en1aciy
.en1aguach
.en1aguaz
.en1anch
.en1apa
.en1arb
.en1art
.en2artr
.en1ej
.hepta1e
.intra1o
.intra1u
.mal1acon
.mal1acos
.mala1e
.mal1andant
.mal1andanz
.mal1est
.mal1int
.pan1ame
.pan1esl
.pan1eur
.pan1isl
.pan1ópt
1p2teríneo
3p2sic
3p2siq
.re1a
.re2al
.re3alc
.re3aleg
.re3alq
.re3alz
.re1e
.re1im
.re1inc
.re1ing
.re1ins
.re1int
.re1ob
.re1oc
.re1oj
.re1org
.re1unt
.retro1a
.so1a
.sud1afr
.sud1ame
.sud1est
sud1oes
.sur1ame
.sur1est
.sur1oes
.tele1imp
.tele1obj
.tras1a
.tras1o
.tras2oñ
.tran2s1alp
.tran2s1and
.tran2s1atl
.tran2s1oce
.tran2s1ur
.tri1óx
